Louisiana, session 2026, HB785.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part IX of Chapter 17 of Title 3 of the Revised Statutes of 1950 comprised
of R.S. 3:2521, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART IX. ANIMAL REHABILITATION
§2521. Animal Rehabilitation Program
There shall be established within the Department of Agriculture and Forestry
a program to permit the housing, treatment, and care of injured or orphaned
indigenous animals with the goal of subsequent release of those healthy animals to
appropriate habitats in the wild. The commissioner shall work with the state
veterinarian to establish rules and procedures for the program.
Section 2. This Act shall take effect and become operative if and when the proposed
amendment of Article IX of the Constitution of Louisiana contained in the Act which
originated as House Bill No. _____ of this 2026 Regular Session of the Legislature is
adopted at a statewide election and becomes effective.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-413 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 785